Wyoming, session 2025, SF0107.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
Section 1. W.S. 1-23-108 is created to read:
1-23-108. Contractual provisions in restraint of
trade generally void; exceptions; unlawful intimidation.
(a) Any covenant not to compete that restricts the
right of any person to receive compensation for performance
of skilled or unskilled labor shall be void. This
subsection shall not apply to:
(i) Any covenant not to compete contained in a
contract for the purchase and sale of a business or the
assets of a business;
(ii) Any covenant not to compete to the extent
the covenant provides for the protection of trade secrets
as defined by W.S. 6-3-501(a)(xi);
(iii) Any contractual provision providing for
the recovery of all or a portion of the expense of
relocating, educating and training an employee as follows:
(A) Recovery of not more than one hundred
percent (100%) of the expense for an employee who has
served an employer for a period of less than two (2) years;
1

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0107
ENROLLED ACT NO. 87, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
(B) Recovery of not more than sixty-six
percent (66%) of the expense for an employee who has served
an employer for between two (2) and less than three (3)
years;
(C) Recovery of not more than thirty-three
percent (33%) of the expense for an employee who has served
an employer for between three (3) and less than four (4)
years.
(iv) Executive and management personnel and
officers and employees who constitute professional staff to
executive and management personnel.
(b) Any covenant not to compete provision of an
employment, partnership or corporate agreement between
physicians that restricts the right of a physician to
practice medicine as defined in W.S. 33-26-102(a)(xi), upon
termination of the physician's employment, partnership or
corporate affiliation, is void, provided that all other
provisions of the agreement enforceable at law shall remain
enforceable.
(c) Notwithstanding subsection (b) of this section,
upon termination of the employment, partnership or
corporate affiliation, or upon the voiding of an agreement
not to compete specified in subsection (b) of this section,
a physician may disclose his continuing practice of
medicine and new professional contact information to any
patient with a rare disorder as defined in accordance with
the national organization for rare disorders, or a
successor organization, to whom the physician was providing
consultation or treatment before termination of the
employment, partnership or corporate affiliation. Neither
the physician nor the physician's employer shall be liable
2

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0107
ENROLLED ACT NO. 87, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
to any party to the prior agreement for damages alleged to
have resulted from the disclosure or from the physician's
treatment of the patient after termination of the prior
agreement or employment, partnership or corporate
affiliation.
Section 2.
(a) This act shall apply to contracts entered into on
and after July 1, 2025.
(b) Nothing in this act shall be construed to alter,
amend or impair any contract or agreement entered into
before July 1, 2025.
3

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0107
ENROLLED ACT NO. 87, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
Section 3. This act is effective July 1, 2025.
(END)
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
Governor
TIME APPROVED: _________
DATE APPROVED: _________
I hereby certify that this act originated in the Senate.
Chief Clerk
4